Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.350

Coordination of county administrative programs—Coordinating agency—Agency reimbursement.

County legislative authorities may designate the Washington state association of counties as a coordinating agency in the execution of duties imposed by RCW 36.32.335 through 36.32.360 and reimburse the association from county current expense funds in the county legislative authority's budget for the costs of any such services rendered. Such reimbursement shall be paid on vouchers submitted to the county auditor and approved by the county legislative authority in the manner provided for the disbursement of other current expense funds and the vouchers shall set forth the nature of the service rendered, supported by affidavit that the service has actually been performed.

[ 1991 c 363 s 59; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 30; 1971 ex.s. c 85 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 47 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.350. Prior: 1947 c 49 s 1; 1939 c 188 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4077-4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Associations of municipal corporations or municipal officers to furnish information to legislature and governor: RCW 44.04.170.

Merger of state association of counties with state association of county officials: RCW 36.47.070.

Winter recreation advisory committee, representative of association of counties as member: RCW 79A.05.255.